Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,208
Title III, defined.

Title III means the Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act pursuant to Title III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, as amended.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 18.